Missouri, session 2026, SB1224.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 542.296 and 542.525, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 542.296 and 542.525, to read as follows:
542.296. 1. A person aggrieved by an unlawful seizure
made by an officer and against whom there is a pending
criminal proceeding growing out of the subject matter of the
seizure may file a motion to suppress the use in evidence of
the property or matter seized. For the purposes of this
section, a pending criminal proceeding shall mean any
criminal investigation being conducted with the intention of
using the seized subject matter in seeking an indictment or
information or when an information has been issued or an
indictment returned.
2. The motion to suppress shall be in writing. It
shall be filed with the court in which there is pending
against the moving party a criminal proceeding growing out
of the subject matter of the seizure.
3. The motion shall be made before the commencement of
the trial of the moving party on the charge arising out of
the seizure unless he was unaware of the grounds or had no
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1224 2
opportunity to do so before the trial. In that event the
motion may be made during the trial. However, the trial
judge may in his discretion entertain a motion any time
during trial.
4. Notice shall be given to the prosecuting attorney
of the date, time, place and nature of the hearing.
5. The motion to suppress may be based upon any one or
more of the following grounds:
(1) That the search and seizure were made without
warrant and without lawful authority;
(2) That the warrant was improper upon its face or was
illegally issued, including the issuance of a warrant
without proper showing of probable cause;
(3) That the property seized was not that described in
the warrant and that the officer was not otherwise lawfully
privileged to seize the same;
(4) That the warrant was illegally executed by the
officer;
(5) That in any other manner the search and seizure
violated the rights of the movant under Section 15 of
Article I of the Constitution of Missouri, or the fourth and
fourteenth amendments of the Constitution of the United
States;
(6) That the search and seizure were made without
warrant on the property of a landowner who fenced or posted
a "no trespassing" sign on the property or, by some other
means, indicated unmistakably that entry is not permitted,
except in the case of national security or in the case of a
missing person.
6. The judge shall receive evidence on any issue of
fact necessary to the decision of the motion. The burden of
going forward with the evidence and the risk of

SB 1224 3
nonpersuasion shall be upon the state to show by a
preponderance of the evidence that the motion to suppress
should be overruled.
7. If the motion is sustained, the judge shall order
the property or matter delivered to the moving party, unless
its retention is authorized or required by section 542.301,
or by any other law of this state.
542.525. No employee of a state agency or a political
subdivision of the state shall place any surveillance camera
or game camera on private property without first obtaining
consent from the landowner or the landowner's designee[;] or
a search warrant as required by and under Article I, Section
15 of the Constitution of Missouri or the Fourth and
Fourteenth Amendments of the Constitution of the United
States[; or permission from the highest ranking law
enforcement chief or officer of the agency or political
subdivision, provided that permission of the highest ranking
law enforcement chief or officer of the agency or political
subdivision is valid only when the camera is facing a
location that is open to public access or use and the camera
is located within one hundred feet of the intended
surveillance location].
✓